Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 3. Condemnation of Public Lands

38-3-101.
Condemning public land - petition.

Whenever any corporation authorized to appropriate for a public use by the exercise of the right of eminent domain lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands requires, needs, or desires to appropriate lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands which belong to the United States, the state of Colorado, or any other state or sovereignty, such corporation, for the purpose of having such lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements appropriated to such use and for determining the compensation to be paid to such owner therefor, may present a petition to the district court in each of the counties in which such lands, or any part thereof, are located, describing the desired property, giving the name of the owner thereof, and stating by whom and for what purpose it is proposed to be appropriated and that it is needed and required by the petitioner for the public use to which it is proposed to devote the same, and praying that such court appropriate such property to its use and determine the compensation to be paid to the owner therefor.

History.

Source:
L. 15:

P. 229, § 1.

C.L.

§ 6331.

CSA:

C. 61, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 50-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-3-1.

L. 64:

P. 266, § 167.

38-3-102.
Notice - service - publication.

The court shall fix a time for the first hearing upon said petition. Notice directed to such owner of the filing of the petition and its object and containing a description of the property and of the time and place of the first hearing shall be published by such corporation in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the state of Colorado once a week for six weeks prior to the time set for the first hearing. At least two weeks before the time set for the first hearing, a copy of said notice shall be served on any party who is in actual possession of the land, and, in case the state is the owner, on the attorney general, and, in case the United States is the owner, on the United States attorney for the district in which the land or any part thereof is situated. The copy of such notice shall be deemed to have been sufficiently served if delivered during the usual hours of business at the residence of the party in possession or at the office of the attorney general or the United States attorney, as the case may be.

History.

Source:
L. 15:

P. 230, § 2.

C.L.

§ 6332.

CSA:

C. 61, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 50-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-3-2.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 607, § 33, effective July 1.

38-3-103.
Hearing - findings filed - published.

Upon proof being filed of the publication of such notice and of such personal service where required, the court, at the time and place therein fixed or to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall proceed to hear the allegations and proofs of all persons interested which touch the matters committed to it, and it shall regulate the order of proof as it may deem best. The testimony taken by it shall be under oath. The court shall determine the truth of the matters alleged and set forth in the petition and also the compensation to be paid to such owner for the lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands to be appropriated. In the event that the petitioner has theretofore taken possession of such lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands, the value thereof shall be determined without considering the value of any improvements that may have been constructed by such corporation and as of the date when such corporation took possession. The court shall file among its records its findings in writing and shall give notice to the petitioner that its findings have been filed. The petitioner shall cause a notice to be published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the state of Colorado once a week for two weeks, setting forth that the findings of the court have been filed and stating the amount of the compensation fixed by the court. If the owner has appeared in said proceeding by attorney, a copy of said notice shall be served prior to the last publication of said notice upon the attorney so appearing.

History.

Source:
L. 15:

P. 230, § 3.

C.L.

§ 6333.

CSA:

C. 61, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 50-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-3-3.

38-3-104.
Order - copy recorded.

In case no appeal is taken within thirty days after the last publication of notice that the findings of the court have been filed, the court, upon the payment by the petitioner to the clerk of such court of the compensation fixed by the court and upon motion of the petitioner, shall enter an order appropriating the lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands, as the case may be, to the petitioner. Thereafter, the same shall be the property of the petitioner, and a certified copy of the order may be filed for record with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands are located. Such record shall be notice, and a certified copy of such record shall be evidence of the title and rights of the petitioner as therein set forth. The clerk of said court shall notify the owner of the property of the payment of the compensation fixed by the court and shall pay the same to such owner on demand.

History.

Source:
L. 15:

P. 231, § 4.

C.L.

§ 6334.

CSA:

C. 61, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 50-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-3-4.

38-3-105.
Judgment - appellate review.

Upon the payment into court of the compensation assessed, the court shall give judgment appropriating the lands, rights-of-way, or other rights or easements in lands, as the case may be, to the petitioner, and thereafter the same shall be the property of the petitioner. Either party to the action may appeal from the judgment in like manner and with like effect as in ordinary condemnation cases. Such appeal shall not stay the proceedings so as to prevent the petitioner from taking such lands into its possession and using them for the purposes of the petitioner or from proceeding to exercise the rights-of-way or other rights or easements appropriated.

History.

Source:
L. 15:

P. 231, § 5.

C.L.

§ 6335.

CSA:

C. 61, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 50-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-3-5.